Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-3704
Club representative, defined.

Club representative shall mean any person in this state designated by the club who acts or aids in any manner in the solicitation, negotiation, or renewal of motor club service contracts, except it shall not mean any person performing only work of a clerical nature in the office of a club or providing an application to a potential club member.

Laws 1981, LB 113, § 4.